California statutes. Penal Code
(a) When a complaint is presented to a judge in a misdemeanor or infraction case appearing to be triable in the judge’s court, the judge must, if satisfied therefrom that the offense complained of has been committed and that there is reasonable ground to believe that the defendant has committed it, issue a warrant, for the arrest of the defendant.

(b) Such warrant of arrest and proceedings upon it shall be in conformity to the provisions of this code regarding warrants of
 arrest, and it may be in the following form:

County of ____

The people of the State of California, to any peace officer in this state:

Complaint upon oath having been this day made before me that the offense of ____ (designating it generally) has been committed and accusing ____ (name of defendant) thereof you are therefore commanded forthwith to arrest the above-named defendant and bring the defendant forthwith before the ____ Court of ____ (stating full title of court) at ____ (naming place).

Witness my hand and the seal of said court this ____ day of ____, 19__.(Signed).Judge of said courtIf it appears that the offense complained of has been committed by a corporation, no warrant of arrest shall issue, but the judge must issue a summons substantially in the form prescribed in Section 1391. Such summons must be served at the time and in the manner designated in Section 1392 except that if the offense complained of is a violation of the Vehicle Code or a local ordinance adopted pursuant to the Vehicle Code, such summons may be served by deposit by the clerk of the court in the United States mail of an envelope enclosing the summons, which envelope shall be addressed to a person authorized to accept service of legal process on behalf of the defendant, and which envelope shall be mailed
 by registered mail or certified mail with a return receipt requested. Promptly upon such mailing, the clerk of the court shall execute a certificate of such mailing and place it in the file of the court for that case. At the time stated in the summons the corporation may appear by counsel and answer the complaint, except that in the case of misdemeanors arising from operation of motor vehicles, or of infractions arising from operation of motor vehicles, a corporation may appear by its president, vice president, secretary or managing agent for the purpose of entering a plea of guilty. If it does not appear, a plea of not guilty shall be entered, and the same proceedings had therein as in other cases.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 931, Sec. 409.   Effective September 28, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

1428.

In misdemeanor and infraction cases, the clerk of the superior court may keep a docket, instead of minutes pursuant to Section 69844 of the Government Code and a register of actions pursuant to Section 69845 or 69845.5 of the Government Code. In the docket, the clerk shall enter the title of each criminal action or proceeding and under each title all the orders and proceedings in such action or proceeding. Wherever by any other section of this code made applicable to such court an entry of any judgment, order or other proceeding in the minutes or register of
 actions is required, an entry thereof in the docket shall be made and shall be deemed a sufficient entry in the minutes or register of actions for all purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 784, Sec. 553.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

1428.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, courts may conduct proceedings, including arraignments and trials, remotely for all infractions.

(1) Courts shall obtain the defendant’s consent to conduct proceedings remotely.

(2) The court may require the physical presence of any witness or party in court for a particular proceeding.

(3) This subdivision does not apply to misdemeanor or felony proceedings.

(b) Remote proceedings include use of technology for remote appearances.

(c) The Judicial
 Council may adopt rules of court to implement this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 79, Sec. 35.   (AB 143)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1429.

In a misdemeanor case the plea of the defendant may be made by the defendant or by the defendant’s counsel. If such defendant pleads guilty, the court may, before entering such plea or pronouncing judgment, examine witnesses to ascertain the gravity of the offense committed; and if it appears to the court that a higher offense has been committed than the offense charged in the complaint, the court may order the defendant to be committed or admitted to bail, to answer any indictment which may be found against the defendant by the grand jury, or any complaint which
 may be filed charging the defendant with such higher offense.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 931, Sec. 411.   Effective September 28, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

1445.

When the defendant pleads guilty, or is convicted, either by the court, or by a jury, the court shall render judgment thereon of fine or imprisonment, or both, as the case may be.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1360, Sec. 117.)
-------------------------------------------

1447.

When the defendant is acquitted in a misdemeanor or infraction case, if the court certifies in the minutes that the prosecution was malicious and without probable cause, the court may order the complainant to pay the costs of the action, or to give an undertaking to pay the costs within 30 days after the trial.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 931, Sec. 413.   Effective September 28, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

1448.

If the complainant does not pay the costs, or give an undertaking therefor, the court may enter judgment against the complainant for the amount of the costs, which may be enforced in the manner provided for enforcement of money judgments generally.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 18, Sec. 25.   Effective April 21, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

1449.

In a misdemeanor or infraction case, after a plea, finding, or verdict of guilty, or after a finding or verdict against the defendant on a plea of former conviction or acquittal, or once in jeopardy, the court shall appoint a time for pronouncing judgment which shall be not less than six hours, nor more than five days, after the verdict or plea of guilty, unless the defendant waives the postponement. The court may extend the time for not more than 10 days for the purpose of hearing or determining any motion for a new trial, or in arrest of judgment. The court also
 may extend the time for not more than 20 judicial days if probation is considered. Upon request of the defendant or the probation officer, that time may be further extended for not more than 90 additional days. In case of postponement, the court may hold the defendant to bail to appear for judgment. If, in the opinion of the court there is a reasonable ground for believing a defendant insane, the court may extend the time of pronouncing judgment and may commit the defendant to custody until the question of insanity has been heard and determined.

If the defendant is a veteran who was discharged from service for mental disability, upon his or her request, his or her case shall be referred to the probation officer, who shall secure a military medical history of the defendant and present it to the court together with a recommendation for or against probation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 931, Sec. 414.   Effective September 28, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

1457.

Upon payment of the fine, the officer must discharge the defendant, if he is not detained for any other legal cause, and pay over the fine to the court which rendered the judgment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1949, Ch. 1517.   Note: The condition in Sec. 5 of Ch. 1517 was satisfied by adoption of Prop. 3 on Nov. 7, 1950.)
-------------------------------------------

1458.

The provisions of this code relative to bail are applicable to bail in misdemeanor or infraction cases. The defendant, at any time after arrest and before conviction, may be admitted to bail. The undertaking of bail in such a case shall be in substantially the following form:

A complaint having been filed on the ____ day of ____, 19__, in the ____ Court of ____ County of ____ (stating title and location of court) charging ____ (naming defendant) as defendant with the crime of ____ (designating it generally) and the
 defendant having been admitted to bail in the sum of ____ dollars ($____) (stating amount);

We, ____ and ____, of ____ (stating their places of residence and occupation), hereby undertake that the above-named defendant will appear and answer any charge in any accusatory pleading based upon the acts supporting the complaint above mentioned and all duly authorized amendments thereof, in whatever court it may be prosecuted, and will at all times hold himself or herself amenable to the orders and process of the court, and, if convicted, will appear for pronouncement of judgment or grant of probation or if the defendant fails to perform either of these conditions, that we will pay to the people of the State of California the sum of ____ dollars ($____) (inserting the sum in which the defendant is admitted to bail). If the forfeiture of this bond is ordered by the court, judgment may be summarily made and entered forthwith against the said ____ (naming the sureties and
 the defendant if the defendant is a party to the bond) for the amount of their respective undertakings herein, as provided by Sections 1305 and 1306 of the California Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 931, Sec. 415.   Effective September 28, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

1459.

Undertakings of bail filed by admitted surety insurers shall meet all other requirements of law and the obligation of the insurer shall be in the following form except to the extent a different form is otherwise provided by statute: 

____ (stating the title and the location of the court).

Defendant ____ (stating the name of the defendant) having been admitted to bail in the sum of ____ dollars ($____) (stating the amount of bail fixed) and ordered to appear in the
 above-entitled court on ____, 19__ (stating the date for appearance in court), on ____ (stating only the word “misdemeanor” or the word “felony”) charge/s;

Now, the ____ (stating the name of admitted surety insurer and state of incorporation) hereby undertakes that the above-named defendant will appear in the above-named court on the date above set forth to answer any charge in any accusatory pleading based upon the acts supporting the complaint filed against him/her and all duly authorized amendments thereof, in whatever court it may be prosecuted, and will at all times hold him/herself amenable to the orders and process of the court and, if convicted, will appear for pronouncement of judgment or grant of probation or if he/she fails to perform either of these conditions, that the ____ (stating the name of admitted surety insurer and state of incorporation) will pay to the people of the State of California the sum of ____ dollars ($____) (stating the amount of the
 undertaking of the admitted surety insurer).

If the forfeiture of this bond be ordered by the court, judgment may be summarily made and entered forthwith against the said ____ (stating the name of admitted surety insurer and state of incorporation) for the amount of its undertaking herein, as provided by Sections 1305 and 1306 of the California Penal Code.(Stating the name of admitted surety insurer and 
state of incorporation),(Signature)By Attorney-in-fact
 (Corporate seal)(Jurat of notary public or
 other officer authorized 
 to administer oaths.)

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 931, Sec. 416.   Effective September 28, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

1462.2.

Except as otherwise provided in the Vehicle Code, the proper court for the trial of criminal cases amounting to misdemeanor shall be the superior court of the county within which the offense charged was committed.

If an action or proceeding is commenced in a court other than the court herein designated as the proper court for the trial, the action may, notwithstanding, be tried in the court where commenced, unless the defendant, at the time of pleading, requests an order transferring the action or proceeding to the
 proper court. If after that request it appears that the action or proceeding was not commenced in the proper court, the court shall order the action or proceeding transferred to the proper court. The judge shall, at the time of arraignment, inform the defendant of the right to be tried in the county where the offense was committed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 449, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

1462.25.

(a) A defendant formally charged with a violation of Vehicle Code Section 14601 in one court (“the first court”), against whom a formal charge of a violation of Vehicle Code Section 14601 is pending in one or more other courts, may state in writing his or her agreement to plead guilty or nolo contendere to some or all of the charges pending in the other courts, to waive trial or hearing in the other courts, and to consent to disposition of the case in the first court. The defendant’s agreement is ineffective unless the district attorney for
 the other county approves in writing. Upon receipt of the defendant’s agreement and the district attorney’s approval, the clerk of court in the other court shall transfer the pending matter to the first court, and transmit the papers or certified copies. The prosecution of each transferred matter shall proceed in the first court as part of the case pending against the defendant there, but shall be limited to proceedings upon the defendant’s plea of guilty or nolo contendere, and sentencing or probation. If the defendant pleads not guilty, the clerk shall retransfer the transferred case to the court of origin, and the prosecution shall be resumed in that court. The defendant’s statement that the defendant agreed to plead guilty or nolo contendere shall not be used against the defendant.

(b) The procedure specified in subdivision (a) may be used only if the defendant is represented by counsel in the other courts, or the defendant has expressly
 waived his or her right to counsel in the other courts.

(c) A defendant may request appointment of counsel in the other courts by a written request. Upon receiving the defendant’s written request, the other court shall appoint counsel to represent the defendant if he or she otherwise qualifies for appointed counsel.

(d) The appearance of the defendant in proceedings transferred pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not commence the running of time limits under Section 859b, 860, 861, or 1382.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 389, Sec. 20.   Effective September 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1462.5.

Each installment or partial payment of a fine, penalty, forfeiture, or fee shall be prorated among the state and local shares according to the trial court revenue distribution guidelines established by the Controller pursuant to Section 71380 of the Government Code. In cases subject to Section 1463.18 of the Penal Code, proration shall not occur until the minimum amounts have been transferred to the Restitution Fund as provided in that section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 703, Sec. 18.   (AB 2881)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1463.

All fines and forfeitures imposed and collected for crimes shall be distributed in accordance with Section 1463.001.

The following definitions shall apply to terms used in this chapter:

(a) “Arrest” means any law enforcement action, including issuance of a notice to appear or notice of violation, which results in a criminal charge.

(b) “City” includes any city, city and county, district, including any enterprise special district, community service district, or community service area engaged in police protection activities as reported to the Controller for inclusion in the 1989–90 edition of the Financial Transactions Report Concerning
 Special Districts under the heading of Police Protection and Public Safety, authority, or other local agency (other than a county) which employs persons authorized to make arrests or to issue notices to appear or notices of violation which may be filed in court.

(c) “City arrest” means an arrest by an employee of a city, or by a California Highway Patrol officer within the limits of a city.

(d) “County” means the county in which the arrest took place.

(e) “County arrest” means an arrest by a California Highway Patrol officer outside the limits of a city, or any arrest by a county officer or by any other state officer.

(f) “Court” means the superior court or a juvenile forum established under Section 257 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, in which the
 case arising from the arrest is filed.

(g) “Division of moneys” means an allocation of base fine proceeds between agencies as required by statute, including, but not limited to, Sections 1463.003, 1463.9, 1463.23, and 1463.26 of this code, Sections 13001, 13002, and 13003 of the Fish and Game Code, and Section 11502 of the Health and Safety Code.

(h) “Offense” means any infraction, misdemeanor, or felony, and any act by a juvenile leading to an order to pay a financial sanction by reason of the act being defined as an infraction, misdemeanor, or felony, whether defined in this or any other code, except any parking offense as defined in subdivision (i).

(i) “Parking offense” means any offense charged pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 40200) of Chapter 1 of Division 17 of the Vehicle Code, including
 registration and equipment offenses included on a notice of parking violation.

(j) “Penalty allocation” means the deposit of a specified part of moneys to offset designated processing costs, as provided by Section 1463.16 of this code and by Section 68090.8 of the Government Code.

(k) “Total parking penalty” means the total sum to be collected for a parking offense, whether as fine, forfeiture of bail, or payment of penalty to the Department of Motor Vehicles (DMV). It may include the following components:

(1) The base parking penalty as established pursuant to Section 40203.5 of the Vehicle Code.

(2) The DMV fees added upon the placement of a hold pursuant to Section 40220 of the Vehicle Code.

(3) The surcharges required by Section 76000 of the Government Code.

(4) The notice penalty added to the base parking penalty when a notice of delinquent parking violations is given.

(l) “Total fine or forfeiture” means the total sum to be collected upon a conviction, or the total amount of bail forfeited or deposited as cash bail subject to forfeiture. It may include, but is not limited to, the following components as specified for the particular offense:

(1) The “base fine” upon which the state penalty and additional county penalty is calculated.

(2) The “county penalty” required by Section 76000 of the Government Code.

(3) The “DNA penalty” required by Sections 76104.6 and
 76104.7 of the Government Code.

(4) The “emergency medical services penalty” authorized by Section 76000.5 of the Government Code.

(5) The “service charge” permitted by Section 853.7 of the Penal Code.

(6) The “special penalty” dedicated for blood alcohol analysis, alcohol program services, traumatic brain injury research, and similar purposes.

(7) The “state penalty” required by Section 1464.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 57, Sec. 19.   (AB 199)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1463.001.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, all fines and forfeitures imposed and collected for crimes other than parking offenses resulting from a filing in a court, including civil assessments imposed under Section 1214.1, shall as soon as practicable after receipt thereof, be deposited with the county treasurer, and each month the total fines and forfeitures which have accumulated within the past month shall be distributed, as follows:

(a) The state penalties, county penalties, special penalties, service charges, penalty allocations, and civil assessments imposed under Section
 1214.1, shall be transferred to the proper funds as required by law.

(b) The base fines shall be distributed, as follows:

(1) Any base fines which are subject to specific distribution under any other section shall be distributed to the specified funds of the state or local agency.

(2) Base fines resulting from county arrest not included in paragraph (1), shall be transferred into the proper funds of the county.

(3) Base fines resulting from city arrests not included in paragraph (1), an amount equal to the applicable county percentages set forth in Section 1463.002, as modified by Section 1463.28, shall be transferred into the proper funds of the county. Until July 1, 1998, the remainder of base fines resulting
 from city arrests shall be divided between each city and county, with 50 percent deposited to the county’s general fund, and 50 percent deposited to the treasury of the appropriate city, and thereafter the remainder of base fines resulting from city arrests shall be deposited to the treasury of the appropriate city.

(4) In a county that had an agreement as of March 22, 1977, that provides for city fines and forfeitures to accrue to the county in exchange for sales tax receipts, base fines resulting from city arrests not included in paragraph (1) shall be deposited into the proper funds of the county.

(c) Each county shall keep a record of its deposits to its treasury and its transmittal to each city treasury pursuant to this section.

(d) The distribution specified in subdivision (b) applies to all funds subject
 thereto distributed on or after July 1, 1992, regardless of whether the court has elected to allocate and distribute funds pursuant to Section 1464.8.

(e) Any amounts remitted to the county from amounts collected by the Franchise Tax Board upon referral by a county pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 19280) of Chapter 5 of Part 10.2 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code shall be allocated pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 771, Sec. 17.   (AB 160)   Effective September 29, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1463.002.

The base fine amounts from city arrests shall be subject to distribution according to the following schedule:County and cityPercentageAlamedaAlameda 18Albany 29Berkeley 19Emeryville 13Hayward 10Livermore 7Oakland 22Piedmont 44Pleasanton 17San Leandro 9County percentage 21AmadorAmador 25Ione 25Jackson 25Plymouth 25Sutter Creek 25County percentage 29ButteBiggs 75Chico 22Gridley 49Oroville 9County percentage 20CalaverasAngels 62County percentage 62ColusaColusa 13Williams 17County percentage 16Contra CostaAntioch 11Brentwood 24Concord 18El Cerrito 19Hercules 14Martinez 22Pinole 22Pittsburg 5Richmond 14San Pablo 12Walnut Creek 24County percentage 14Del NorteCrescent City 19County percentage 19El DoradoPlacerville 14County percentage 14FresnoClovis 23Coalinga 21Firebaugh 16Fowler 34Fresno 26Huron 24Kerman 14Kingsburg 34Mendota 11Orange Cove 24Parlier 21Reedley 30Sanger 29San Joaquin 15Selma 14County percentage 24GlennOrland 27Willows 36County percentage 32HumboldtArcata 9Blue Lake 26Eureka 11Ferndale 30Fortuna 17Trinidad 11County percentage 11ImperialBrawley 8Calexico 10Calipatria 30El Centro 5Holtville 16Imperial 6Westmorland 12County percentage 8InyoBishop 25County percentage 25KernBakersfield 10Delano 13Maricopa 36Shafter 15Taft 19Tehachapi 12Wasco 28County percentage 12KingsCorcoran 31Hanford 21Lemoore 25County percentage 25LakeLakeport 33County percentage 33LassenSusanville 21County percentage 21Los AngelesAlhambra 13Arcadia 11Avalon 54Azusa 11Bell 11Beverly Hills 14Burbank 14Claremont 5Compton 16Covina 11Culver City 10El Monte 11El Segundo 11Gardena 22Glendale 16Glendora 12Hawthorne 7Hermosa Beach 14Huntington Park 12Inglewood 16La Verne 14Long Beach 14Los Angeles 8Lynwood 9Manhattan Beach 13Maywood 15Monrovia 11Montebello 11Monterey Park 11Palos Verdes Estates 10Pasadena 9Pomona 12Redondo Beach 15San Fernando 17San Gabriel 16San Marino 5Santa Monica 11Sierra Madre 11Signal Hill 24South Gate 13South Pasadena 9Torrance 16Vernon 25West Covina 11Whittier 11County percentage 11MaderaChowchilla 17Madera 16County
 percentage 17MarinBelvedere 16Corte Madera 12Fairfax 30Larkspur 30Mill Valley 13Ross 18San Anselmo 11San Rafael 13Sausalito 21County percentage 16MendocinoFort Bragg 19Point Arena 40Ukiah 10Willits 24County percentage 17MercedAtwater 23Dos Palos 21Gustine 23Livingston 14Los Banos 13Merced 18County percentage 18ModocAlturas 42County percentage 42MontereyCarmel 17Gonzales 10Greenfield 13King City 36Monterey 13Pacific Grove 22Salinas 36Soledad 16County percentage 23NapaCalistoga 37Napa 11St. Helena 12County
 percentage 14NevadaGrass Valley 7Nevada City 17County percentage 9OrangeCounty percentage 15PlacerAuburn 18Colfax 8Lincoln 26Rocklin 16Roseville 10County percentage 14PlumasPortola 19County percentage 19RiversideBanning 35Beaumont 15Blythe 9Coachella 12Corona 12Elsinore 10Hemet 35Indio 16Palm Springs 35Perris 14Riverside 16San Jacinto 41County percentage 35SacramentoFolsom 31Galt 25Isleton 13North Sacramento 10Sacramento 21County percentage 26San BenitoHollister 9San Juan Bautista 28County percentage 11San BernardinoBarstow 23Chino 14Colton 21Fontana 15Needles 33Ontario 20Redlands 28Rialto 15San Bernardino 20Upland 14County percentage 20San DiegoCarlsbad 8Chula Vista 23Coronado 25Del Mar 8El Cajon 17Escondido 16Imperial Beach 8La Mesa 23Lemon Grove 8National City 14Oceanside 15San Marcos 8Vista 8San Diego 6County percentage 25San JoaquinLodi 18Manteca 8Ripon 11Stockton 14Tracy 15County percentage 14San Luis ObispoArroyo Grande 9Paso Robles 26Pismo Beach 8San Luis Obispo 21County percentage 16San
 MateoAtherton 27Belmont 7Burlingame 38Colma 40Daly City 24Hillsborough 75Menlo Park 12Millbrae 16Redwood City 27San Bruno 13San Carlos 8San Mateo 42South San Francisco 12County percentage 21Santa BarbaraGuadalupe 28Lompoc 16Santa Barbara 11Santa Maria 12County percentage 13Santa ClaraAlviso 75Campbell 16Gilroy 28Los Altos 16Los Gatos 30Morgan Hill 11Mountain View 13Palo Alto 21San Jose 13Santa Clara 16Sunnyvale 26County percentage 16Santa CruzCapitola 21Santa Cruz 23Watsonville 21County percentage 22ShastaRedding 22County percentage 22SierraLoyalton 75County percentage 75SiskiyouDorris 18Dunsmuir 29Etna 18Fort Jones 46Montague 75Mount Shasta 37Tulelake 33Yreka 30County percentage 29SolanoBenicia 17Dixon 18Fairfield 18Rio Vista 19Suisun 7Vacaville 15Vallejo 18County percentage 19SonomaCloverdale 40Cotati 40Healdsburg 40Petaluma 24Rohnert Park 40Santa Rosa 40Sebastopol 40Sonoma 40County percentage 40StanislausCeres 14Modesto 15Newman 10Oakdale 15Patterson 20Riverbank 18Turlock 19County percentage 15SutterLive Oak 17Yuba City 17County percentage 17TehamaCorning 26Red Bluff 39Tehama 10County percentage 31TulareDinuba 21Exeter 23Lindsay 24Porterville 26Tulare 20Visalia 17Woodlake 15County percentage 21TuolumneSonora 23County percentage 23VenturaFillmore 16Ojai 16Oxnard 16Port Hueneme 16Santa Paula 16Ventura 16County percentage 16YoloDavis 22Winters 19Woodland 20County percentage 20YubaMarysville 15Wheatland 38County percentage 15With respect to any city arrest from a city which is not set forth in the above schedule, the county percentage shall apply. A county and city therein may, by mutual agreement, adjust these percentages. Where a county and a city have, prior to June 1, 1991, entered into an agreement to adjust the percentage specified in this section, or where a county and a city have entered into an agreement governing the distribution of revenue from parking penalties, those agreements shall remain in full force and effect until changed by mutual agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 189, Sec. 20.   Effective July 29, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

1463.004.

(a) If a sentencing judge specifies only the total fine or forfeiture, or if an automated case-processing system requires it, percentage calculations may be employed to establish the components of total fines or forfeitures, provided that the aggregate monthly distributions resulting from the calculations are the same as would be produced by strict observance of the statutory distributions. 

(b) If a fund would receive less than one hundred dollars ($100) in monthly distributions of total fines and forfeitures by a particular court for at
 least 11 months of each year, the court may omit that fund from the system for calculating distributions, and shall instead apply the distribution provided for by Section 1463.001.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 189, Sec. 22.   Effective July 29, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

1463.005.

Notwithstanding Section 1463.001, in a county subject to Section 77202.5 of the Government Code, of base fines resulting from arrests not subject to allocation under paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 1463.001, by a California Highway Patrol Officer on state highways constructed as freeways within the city whereon city police officers enforced the provisions of the Vehicle Code on April 1, 1965, 25 percent shall be deposited in the treasury of the appropriate city, 75 percent shall be deposited in the proper funds of the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 850, Sec. 51.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

1463.006.

Any money deposited with the court or with the clerk thereof which, by order of the court or for any other reason, should be returned, in whole or in part, to any person, or which is by law payable to the state or to any other public agency, shall be paid to that person or to the state or to the other public agency by warrant of the county auditor, which shall be drawn upon the requisition of the clerk of the court.

All money deposited as bail which has not been claimed within one year after the final disposition of the case in which the money was deposited, or within one year after an
 order made by the court for the return or delivery of the money to any person, shall be apportioned between the city and the county and paid or transferred in the manner provided by statute for the apportionment and payment of fines and forfeitures. This paragraph controls over any conflicting provisions of law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 189, Sec. 23.   Effective July 29, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

1463.007.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, a county or court that operates a comprehensive collection program may deduct the costs of operating that program, excluding capital expenditures, from any revenues collected under that program. The costs shall be deducted before any distribution of revenues to other governmental entities required by any other law. A county or court operating a comprehensive collection program may establish a minimum base fee, fine, forfeiture, penalty, or assessment amount for inclusion in the program.

(b) Once debt becomes delinquent, it continues to be delinquent and may be subject to collection by a comprehensive collection program. Debt is delinquent
 and subject to collection by a comprehensive collection program if any of the following
 conditions is met:

(1) A defendant does not post bail or appear on or before the date on which the defendant promised to appear, or any lawful continuance of that date, if that defendant was eligible to post and forfeit bail.

(2) A defendant does not pay the amount imposed by the court on or before the date ordered by the court, or any lawful continuance of that date.

(3) A defendant has failed to make an installment payment on the date specified by the court.

(c) For the purposes of this section, a “comprehensive collection program” is a separate and distinct revenue collection activity that meets each of the following criteria:

(1) The program identifies and collects amounts arising from
 delinquent court-ordered debt, whether or not a warrant has been issued against the alleged violator.

(2) The program complies with the requirements of subdivision (b) of Section 1463.010.

(3) The program engages in each of the following activities:

(A) Attempts telephone contact with delinquent debtors for whom the program has a telephone number to inform them of their delinquent status and payment options.

(B) Notifies delinquent debtors for whom the program has an address in writing of their outstanding obligation within 95 days of delinquency.

(C) Generates internal monthly reports
 to track collections data, such as age of debt and delinquent amounts outstanding.

(D) Uses Department of Motor Vehicles information to locate delinquent debtors.

(E) Accepts payment of delinquent debt by credit card.

(4) The program engages in at least five of the following activities:

(A) Sends delinquent debt to the Franchise Tax Board’s Court-Ordered Debt Collections Program.

(B) Sends delinquent debt to the Franchise Tax Board’s Interagency Intercept Collections Program.

(C) Contracts with one or more private debt collectors
 to collect delinquent debt.

(D) Sends monthly bills or account statements to all delinquent debtors.

(E) Contracts with local, regional, state, or national skip tracing or locator resources or services to locate delinquent debtors.

(F) Coordinates with the probation department to locate debtors who may be on formal or informal probation.

(G) Uses Employment Development Department employment and wage information to collect delinquent debt.

(H) Establishes wage and bank account garnishments where appropriate.

(I) Places liens on real
 property owned by delinquent debtors when appropriate.

(J) Uses an automated dialer or automatic call distribution system to manage telephone calls.

(d) A comprehensive collection program shall also administer nondelinquent installment payment plans ordered pursuant to Section 68645.2 of the Government Code, and may recover up to and including thirty-five dollars ($35) per nondelinquent installment plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 241, Sec. 28.   (SB 857)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1463.009.

Notwithstanding Section 1463, all bail forfeitures that are collected from any source in a case in which a defendant is charged and convicted of a violation of Section 261, 264.1, 286, 287, 288, 288.5, or 289, or former Section 288a, or of a violent felony as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5 or a serious felony as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 1192.7, and that are required to be deposited with the county treasurer shall be allocated according to the following priority:

(a) The county shall be reimbursed for reasonable administrative costs for the collection of the forfeited property, the maintenance and preservation of the property, and the distribution of the property pursuant to this section.

(b) Out of the remainder of the forfeited bail money, a total of up to 50 percent shall be distributed in the amount necessary to satisfy any civil court judgment in favor of a victim as a result of the offense or a restitution order due to a criminal conviction to a victim who was under 18 years of age at the time of the commission of the offense if the defendant is convicted under Section 261, 264.1, 286, 287, 288, 288.5, or 289,
 or former Section 288a, and to a victim of any age if the defendant has been convicted of a violent felony as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5 or a serious felony as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 1192.7.

(c) The balance of the amount collected shall be deposited pursuant to Section 1463.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 423, Sec. 99.   (SB 1494)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1463.010.

The uniform imposition and enforcement of court-ordered debts are recognized as an important element of California’s judicial system. Prompt, efficient, and effective imposition and collection of court-ordered fees, fines, forfeitures, penalties, restitution, and assessments ensure the appropriate respect for court orders. The California State Association of Counties and the Judicial Council are jointly committed to identifying, improving, and seeking to expand access to mechanisms and tools that will enhance efforts to collect court-ordered debt. To provide for this prompt, efficient, and effective collection:

(a) The Judicial Council shall adopt guidelines for a comprehensive program concerning the collection of moneys owed for fees, fines,
 forfeitures, penalties, and assessments imposed by court order. As part of its guidelines, the Judicial Council may establish standard agreements for entities to provide collection services. As part of its guidelines, the Judicial Council shall include provisions that promote competition by and between entities in providing collection services to courts and counties. The Judicial Council may delegate to the Administrative Director of the Courts the implementation of the aspects of this program to be carried out at the state level.

(b) The courts and counties shall maintain the collection program that was in place on January 1, 1996, unless otherwise agreed to in writing by the court and county. The program may wholly or partially be staffed and operated within the court itself, may be wholly or partially staffed and operated by the county, or may be wholly or partially contracted with a third party. In carrying out this collection program, each
 superior court and county shall develop a cooperative plan to implement the Judicial Council guidelines. In the event that a court and a county are unwilling or unable to enter into a cooperative plan pursuant to this section, prior to the arbitration procedures required by subdivision (e) of Section 1214.1, the court or the county may request the continuation of negotiations with mediation assistance as mutually agreed upon and provided by the Administrative Director of the Courts and the California State Association of Counties.

(c) The Judicial Council shall develop performance measures and benchmarks to review the effectiveness of the cooperative superior court and county collection programs operating pursuant to this section. Each superior court and county shall jointly report to the Judicial Council, as provided by the Judicial Council, information requested in a reporting template on or before September 1, 2009, and annually thereafter.
 The Judicial Council shall report annually, on or before December 31, to the Legislature, the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, and the Department of Finance all of the information required to be collected and reported pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 68514 of the Government Code.

(d) The Judicial Council may, when the efficiency and effectiveness of the collection process may be improved, facilitate a joint collection program between superior courts, between counties, or between superior courts and counties.

(e) The Judicial Council may establish, by court rule, a program providing for the suspension and nonrenewal of a business and professional license if the holder of the license has unpaid fees, fines, forfeitures, penalties, and assessments imposed upon them under a court order. The Judicial Council may provide that some or all of the superior courts or counties